Maryland, session 2025, HB0055.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Procedure
10–113.
(A) (1) A PERSON MAY FILE A PETITION FOR EXPUNGEMENT OF ANY
MISDEMEANOR OR FELONY CONVICTION AFTER THE COMPLETION OF THE
SENTENCE, PAROLE, PROBATION, AND ANY OTHER FORM OF MANDATORY
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0055*

HOUSE BILL 55
TREATMENT ASSOCIATED WITH THE CONVICTION FOR WHICH EXPUNGEMENT IS
BEING REQUESTED.
(2) A COURT MAY GRANT A PETITION FOR EXPUNGEMENT UNDER
THIS SECTION AT ANY TIME ON A SHOWING OF GOOD CAUSE.
(B) IN MAKING A FINDING OF GOOD CAUSE UNDER THIS SECTION, THE
COURT SHALL CONSIDER:
(1) THE NATURE OF THE CRIME;
(2) THE PERSON’S HISTORY AND CHARACTER;
(3) THE PERSON’S RISK TO PUBLIC SAFETY;
(4) THE PERSON’S SUCCESS AT REHABILITATION;
(5) THE AMOUNT OF TIME SINCE THE CONVICTION; AND
(6) THE IMPACT THE CHARGE HAS ON THE PERSON’S ABILITY TO
SECURE EMPLOYMENT, EDUCATION, HOUSING, PUBLIC ASSISTANCE, LICENSING,
AND OPPORTUNITIES FOR ECONOMIC STABILITY.
(C) IF THE COURT DENIES A PETITION FOR AN EXPUNGEMENT UNDER THIS
SECTION:
(1) THE DENIAL MAY NOT BE APPEALED; AND
(2) THE PERSON WHO FILED THE PETITION MAY NOT FILE A
SUBSEQUENT PETITION FOR EXPUNGEMENT UNDER THIS SECTION FOR THE SAME
CONVICTION FOR AT LEAST 5 YEARS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.